District of Columbia statutes.
38-751.05

Report.

(a)

The Mayor shall create a report that shall include:

(1)

School-level data collected through the early warning and support system for each participating feeder school group;

(2)

Recommendations highlighting best practices to improve high school and college readiness and increase high school graduation rates among all schools, including the feeder school groups; and

(3)

A plan to expand the early warning and support system to all schools within 3 years of June 19, 2012.

(b)

The report shall be submitted to the Council one year after implementation of this subchapter.

History

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 105, 59 DCR 3642